Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1626.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-721, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-721. Driving on right side of roadway; driving on shoulder; exceptions; education A. On all roadways of sufficient width, a person shall drive a vehicle on the right half of the roadway except as follows: 1. When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing the movement. 2. When the right half of a roadway is closed to traffic while under construction or repair. 3. On a roadway divided into three marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable on the roadway. 4. On a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic. B. On all roadways, a person driving a vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall drive the vehicle in the right-hand lane then available for traffic or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway. If a person violates this subsection, the department may assess two points against the person's driving record. C. In an age restricted community that is located in an unincorporated area of a county with a population of more than three million persons, a person may drive a golf cart or a neighborhood electric vehicle on a paved shoulder that is adjacent to a roadway or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of a paved roadway if there is no delineated paved shoulder. D. Defensive driving school courses that are offered by defensive driving schools operated pursuant to chapter 8, article 7 of this title and traffic survival schools operated pursuant to chapter 8, article 7.1 of this title shall include educational information relating to subsections A and B of this section. The department shall include information relating to subsections A and B of this section in any of the department's examination, information and education materials. END_STATUTE